Utah statutes.
23-18-5.   Fur dealer and fur dealer's agent -- Definitions -- Certificates of registration required -- Receipts required.

(1)  Any person engaging in, carrying on, or conducting, wholly or in part, the business of buying, selling, trading, or dealing, within the state, in the skins or pelts of furbearing mammals shall be deemed a fur dealer within the meaning of this code.  All fur dealers shall secure a fur dealer certificate of registration from the Division of Wildlife Resources, but no certificate of registration shall be required for a licensed trapper or fur farmer selling skins or pelts which the licensed trapper or fur farmer has lawfully taken, or raised, nor for any person not a fur dealer who purchases any such skins or pelts exclusively for the person's own use and not for sale.

(2)  Any person who is employed by a resident or nonresident fur dealer as a fur buyer, in the field, is deemed a fur dealer's agent.  Application for a fur dealer's agent certificate of registration shall be made by the fur dealer employing the agent, and no agent certificate of registration shall be issued until the necessary fur dealer certificate of registration has been first secured by the employer of the agent.

(3)  Receipts shall be issued by the vendor to the vendee whenever the skins or pelts of furbearing mammals change ownership by virtue of sale, exchange, barter or gift; and both the vendor and vendee shall produce this receipt or evidence of legal transaction upon request by the Division of Wildlife Resources or other person authorized to enforce the provisions of this code.

